Maine, session 132, LD954.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 3 MRSA §993, first ¶, as amended by PL 2023, c. 417, §1, is further
amended to read:
The membership of the committee and the selection of chairs are established by joint
rule of the Legislature. Beginning with the 132nd Legislature, at least one member of the
committee must be a member of the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over taxation matters and at least one member must be a member of the joint
standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over economic development
matters. No 2 members of the committee may be members of the same joint standing
committee of the Legislature and also members of the same political party.
Sec. 2. Retroactivity. This Act applies retroactively to December 4, 2024.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 1 - 132LR1391(03)